Tennessee, session 114, HB1313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-3-403, is amended by deleting the
language "of up to seven thousand dollars ($7,000)" and substituting "of up to the maximum
penalty allowed by the federal occupational safety and health administration (OSHA)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-3-404(a), is amended by deleting
the language "of up to seven thousand dollars ($7,000)" and substituting "of up to the maximum
penalty allowed by the federal occupational safety and health administration (OSHA)".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-3-405(a), is amended by deleting
the language "of up to seven thousand dollars ($7,000)" and substituting "of up to the maximum
penalty allowed by the federal occupational safety and health administration (OSHA)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-3-405(b), is amended by deleting
the language "of up to seventy thousand dollars ($70,000)" and substituting "of up to the
maximum penalty allowed by the federal occupational safety and health administration (OSHA)".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 50-3-406, is amended by deleting the
language "of up to seven thousand dollars ($7,000)" and substituting "of up to the maximum
penalty allowed by the federal occupational safety and health administration (OSHA)".
SECTION 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to prohibited conduct occurring on or after that date.
HB1313
000171
- 1 -